src/third-party/hunspell-dictionaries/es.dic
ablentar/RDI
abnegar/IRAD
abravecer/IRDL
absolver/RLI     
abstraer/XI LD  
abu olar/RDI
acensuar/RDI
acertar/hRID
acordar/hRID
acornar/RID
actuar/RI DA
adestrar/RDI
adiar/RID
adolecer/IRDL
adonecer/IRDL
adormentar/RID
aducir/XIDA
afeblecer/IRLD
agorar/RDI
agriar/RID 
ahijar/hRDI
ahilar/PI
ahincar/RI
ahitar/hRID
ahuchar/RDI
ahumar/I 
ahusar/IRD
aislar/IRhD
albeldar/RDI
alborecer/RILD
alebrar/RDI
aliquebrar/RDI
almadiar/RDI
altivecer/RID
amanecer/SRDLI
amarecer/RILD
amarillecer/IiDRL
amnistiar/RID
amoblar/hRDI
amohinar/RDI
amollecer/RILD
amorecer/RLID
amortecer/IRLDP
aneblar/RID
anochecer/RDILS
ansiar/RID 
anticuar/DRI
apacentar/RPDI
aparecer/pAhDRIL
apernar/RDI
apetecer/RI   LD
apostar/IRDE      
apretar/IhRpD
aprobar/hRDAI
arcaizar/RID
arrendar/RhDsI
arruar/IRD
asolar/EPI
ataviar/RhDI
aterecer/RLDI
atraer/hXDLI
aullar/IRD
aupar/RID  
avanecer/IRDL
aviar/RhID
baraustar/RDI
bienquerer/DXIS
blanquecer/iRILPD
cabrahigar/RiDI
calcografiar/RDI
calofriar/RDI
canecer/iRDIL
cariar/RIBD
cegar/RIPD    
cimentar/hRID
circunvolar/RID
clocar/iIRaD
cohibir/RI D
compadecer/RIL Q  D
condolecer/IRDL
confesar/RI   D Q
consolar/hRDI
continuar/IRhD
contrariar/RID   
coreografiar/RDI
criar/RhIpjD
cuantiar/RaDI
defender/RI    L  D 
dentar/RihID
desasosegar/RDI
desbravecer/RILD
descafeinar/RID 
descender/RfILD
descontar/pRDI
descornar/RDI
desflocar/IRD
desmajolar/RID
desnegar/I
desoldar/I
desosar/I
despedrar/RID
despezar/RDI
desvanecer/RI DLP
desvergonzar/RDI
detraer/XI
discontinuar/RAID
disolver/RI   L
displacer/RILD
dolar/RDBI
educir/XgID
embarbecer/RLID
embastecer/RLDI
embebecer/hRLDI
embermejecer/RLID
embobecer/RDIPL
embravecer/RLhIPD
empedernecer/RDIL
empeque ecer/RIL D
emplebeyecer/IRDL
empoltronecer/RIDL
emputecer/RLID
enardecer/RLI  DP
encallecer/RILD
encandecer/IRDL
enceguecer/RLI D
encontrar/pRDI
encordar/hIRD
encovar/hRIDE
encruelecer/RLDI
enfervorecer/RLID
enfierecer/RDIL
enfortecer/RILD
enfurecer/RhLID
engorar/RID
engravecer/IRDL
engrumecer/IRDL
enlejiar/RID
enllentecer/IRDL
enloquecer/RIDPL  
enmagrecer/RIDL
enmarillecer/RIDL
enmohecer/hDRIL
enmudecer/RhILD
ennoblecer/RPIDL
enorgullecer/RPI  DL
enralecer/RILD
enrocar/RIED
enronquecer/IRPLD
enruinecer/RIDL
ensangrentar/RDIP
ensilvecer/RDIL
ensolver/IRLD
ensordecer/RPLID 
entenebrecer/RILD
entesar/I
entigrecer/RLID
entorpecer/RDhIL
entrepernar/RID
entumecer/RhPIDL
envanecer/DRIP L
enzurdecer/RILD
escalecer/IRLD
escalofriar/RID
escarnecer/RI  DLP
escocer/RDgBI
esgrafiar/RID
esperriar/RDI
esquiar/RID
estenografiar/RID
estregar/RBIEDP
europeizar/RID
evanecer/IRDL
exceptuar/RID  
extasiar/RDI 
extraviar/RID   
favorecer/RhIDL
florecer/hRipDLI
fortalecer/hRDIL
fosforecer/RILD
fotolitografiar/RID
frutecer/RDIL
gloriar/RI D
grandisonar/RDI
guarnecer/hRLID
hacendar/RDI
hebraizar/RDI
helar/RhDI
herbar/RhID
hermanecer/RILD
herventar/RID
holgar/RDI
humedecer/hDRIpL
individuar/RDI
infatuar/RID
inhestar/RI
introducir/DXIA      
jipiar/RID
juvenecer/RIpDL
lentecer/RpDLI
litofotografiar/RID
lividecer/RID
lozanecer/RLID
malcriar/RDI 
malquerer/XID
mancornar/RDI
mecanografiar/DRI
menstruar/IRAD
mimeografiar/RID
mohecer/aIRiLD
mover/pRIoaDfL
negrecer/LRgiID
obedecer/hRLDI 
obscurecer/RIPDL
onecer/RILD
oscurecer/RIPDL 
palidecer/IRiDL
parecer/IhDjRLa
permanecer/RIDL
pertenecer/RILD
pipiar/RID
poblar/hPRADI
porfiar/RDI
prevalecer/RILD
producir/pXAID  
prohijar/RDPI
puntuar/RDAI
querer/hXID
radiotelegrafiar/IRD
recentar/RIBD
redituar/RDI
regoldar/RDI
rehundir/RI
reilar/RDI
remanecer/LRID
remostecer/RILD
repensar/RI 
rescontrar/RDI
resollar/RDI
resquebrar/IBRCD
retentar/I
retraducir/XI
retrotraer/XDI  L
reuntar/I
rodar/iRDI
ruar/RDI
sahumar/RDIg
salpimentar/RI D
seer/rI
sembrar/pRIrD
serrar/aRID
sobrehilar/I
soler/ISG
sonrodar/RDI
sorregar/RID
soterrar/ERIPD
sustraer/XLI   D  
taquigrafiar/RDI
telegrafiar/RDI 
templar/BIRPED 
torcer/RhfpLDI
traillar/RaDI
trascolar/RDI
trasegar/IRD
trasparecer/RIDL
trasverter/RDIL
travesar/aRDI
trocar/RIhD
usufructuar/DRI 
valuar/aRgpDI
veer/oI 
verter/pRrIDL
volar/RrIpD
yacer/RIsLD
